Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.292

Market value threshold amount.

"Market value threshold amount" means an amount set by rule by the department that is used to determine, together with the age of the vehicle, whether vehicle certificates of title for vehicles aged six years through twenty years should be identified as having been previously destroyed or reported as an insurance total loss.

[ 2010 c 161 s 123.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.